Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF767.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 89.002, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Forest road policy. The commissioner shall provide a system of forest roads and trails which provides access to state forest land and other forest land under the commissioner's authority which is adequate to permit the commissioner to manage, protect, and develop those lands and their forest resources consistent with the forest resource management policy, and to meet demands for forest resources.new text begin The commissioner must ensure that commercial minnow trappers, leech trappers, fur trappers, and loggers have unimpeded access to forest roads. If the commissioner or any other state agency requires a permit to access state forest roads, the commissioner or state agency must issue a permit to any person seeking access to the forest roads for these purposes.new text end